Maine, session 132, LD501.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §15675, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. C,
§30, is amended to read:
A. An Until the beginning of fiscal year 2026-27, an additional weight of .15. The
number of economically disadvantaged students for each school administrative unit is
determined by multiplying the number of resident pupils in the most recent calendar
year by the most recent available elementary free or reduced-price meals percentage.
The elementary free or reduced-price meals percentage may be applied to determine
the number of economically disadvantaged students in the unit's secondary grades; and
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §15675, sub-§2, ¶A-2 is enacted to read:
A-2. Beginning fiscal year 2026-27, an additional weight of .25. The number of
economically disadvantaged students for each school administrative unit is determined
by multiplying the number of resident pupils in the most recent calendar year by the
most recent available elementary free or reduced-price meals percentage. The
elementary free or reduced-price meals percentage may be applied to determine the
number of economically disadvantaged students in the unit's secondary grades; and